Louisiana, session 2026, HB220.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 20-B of Title 51 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 51:1780.1 through 1780.3, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 20-B. PLATFORMS REPORTING ONLINE TRAFFICKING,
ENTICEMENT, AND EXPLOITATION OF CHILDREN TIMELY
§1780.1. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:
(1) "Clear and conspicuous" means presented in a manner that an ordinary
user can easily recognize, read, and understand.
(2)(a) "Covered platform" means an online platform, online video game,
messaging application, or video streaming service that accesses the internet.
(b) "Covered platform" does not include any of the following:
(i) An entity acting in its capacity as a provider of a common carrier service
subject to the Communications Act of 1934, 47 U.S.C. 151 et seq.
(ii) An entity providing broadband internet access service as defined in 47
CFR 54.400.
(iii) An entity acting in its capacity as a provider of an email service.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 220 ENROLLED
(iv) An entity acting in its capacity as a teleconferencing or video
conferencing service that allows reception and transmission of audio or video signals
for real-time communication if the service is not an online platform and the real-time
communication is initiated by using a unique link or identifier to facilitate access.
(v) An entity acting in its capacity as a wireless messaging service, including
a service provided through short messaging service or multimedia messaging service
protocols that is not a component of or linked to an online platform and where the
exclusive function is direct messaging consisting of the transmission of texts, photos,
or videos that are sent by electronic means, where messages are transmitted from the
sender to a recipient.
(vi) A nonprofit corporation.
(vii) A school.
(viii) A public library.
(ix) A news or sports coverage website or application where the inclusion
of video, image, or other visual content on the website or application is related
primarily to the website or application's own gathering, reporting, or publishing of
news content or sports coverage and the website or application is not otherwise an
online platform.
(x) A product or service that primarily functions as business-to-business
software, such as cloud storage, file sharing, or a file collaboration service.
(xi) A virtual private network or similar service that exists predominantly to
route internet traffic between locations.
(xii) A federal, state, or local government with an internet domain.
(xiii) A video streaming service that consists primarily of entertainment or
other information or content that is not user-generated or user-uploaded, but is
preselected by the provider.
(xiv) An entity where the predominant or exclusive function is providing or
obtaining technical support for a platform, product, or service.
(3)(a) "Online platform" means any public website, online service, online
application, or mobile application that predominantly provides a community forum
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 220 ENROLLED
for user-generated content, such as sharing videos, images, games, audio files, or
other content, including a social media service, social network, or virtual reality
environment.
(b) A website, online service, online application, or mobile application is not
considered an online platform solely because it includes a chat, comment, or other
interactive function that is incidental to and not a primary function of the service's
predominant purpose, if such service does not knowingly permit users to upload,
post, transmit, host, or otherwise make available sexually explicit material, as
defined in R.S. 25:225, and maintains reasonable and appropriate measures to
prevent the dissemination of such material.
(4) "Online video game" means a video game, including an educational
video game, that accesses the internet and allows the user to create and upload
content that is not incidental to game play such as character or level designs.
(5) "Report mechanism" means an electronic feature that allows a user to
easily notify the covered platform about suspected child sexual abuse material, or
other instances of child exploitation listed in 34 U.S.C. 11293(b)(1)(K)(i)(I),
appearing on or transmitted through the platform.
§1780.2. Report mechanism
A.(1) A covered platform that allows users to create, share, or view
user-generated content shall provide clear and conspicuous instructions and a clear
and conspicuous method for users to report suspected child sexual abuse material,
or other instances of child sexual exploitation listed in 34 U.S.C.
11293(b)(1)(K)(i)(I), appearing on or transmitted through the platform.
(2) The report mechanism shall meet all of the following requirements:
(a) Be clear and conspicuous.
(b) Be readily locatable and usable through the covered platform's user
interface.
(c) Be clearly labeled using plain language such as "Report Child Sexual
Exploitation" or similar wording.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 220 ENROLLED
(d) Allow the report to be submitted without requiring the reporting user to
register for an account, unless the covered platform requires that a user has a
registered account before accessing any of the features or content of the covered
platform.
(e) Generate an acknowledgment to the reporting user confirming that the
report has been received.
B. The covered platform shall comply with federal law as required pursuant
to 18 U.S.C. 2258A.
C. For purposes of this Section, a covered platform provides a report
mechanism only if the instructions and mechanism are clear and conspicuous and are
not designed, configured, or implemented in a manner that materially impedes a
reasonable user from locating or using the report mechanism.
§1780.3. Penalties
A.(1) Any covered platform that does not provide a reporting mechanism as
required by this Chapter shall be subject to civil penalties as provided in this Section.
(2) The attorney general may conduct an investigation of the alleged
violation and initiate a civil action in the Nineteenth Judicial District Court for the
parish of East Baton Rouge on behalf of the state to assess civil penalties. Prior to
asserting a cause of action, the attorney general shall provide the covered platform
with a period of time of not less than thirty days to comply with this Chapter.
B.(1) Any covered platform that violates this Chapter may be liable for a
civil penalty, to be assessed by the court, of not more than five thousand dollars for
each day of violation to be paid to the Department of Justice, in order to fund the
investigation of cyber crimes involving the exploitation of children. In addition to
the remedies provided in this Section, the attorney general may request and the court
may impose an additional civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars for each
violation of this Chapter against any covered platform found by the court to have not
provided a reporting mechanism as required by this Chapter. The civil penalty shall
be paid to the Department of Justice in order to fund the investigation of cyber
crimes involving the exploitation of children.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 220 ENROLLED
(2) Each violation may be treated as a separate violation or may be combined
into one violation at the option of the attorney general.
(3) Any covered platform that violates this Chapter may be liable to the
attorney general for all costs, expenses, and fees related to investigations and
proceedings associated with the violation, including attorney fees.
(4) If the court assesses a civil penalty pursuant to this Chapter, the
Department of Justice shall be entitled to legal interest as provided in R.S. 9:3500
from the date of imposition of the penalty until paid in full.
Section 2. This Act shall be referred to as the Platforms Reporting Online
Trafficking, Enticement, and Exploitation of Children Timely, or the "PROTECT" Act.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.